Illinois, session 104th, SB3220.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Consumer Data Privacy Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Affiliate" means a legal entity that controls, is 8controlled by, or is under common control with another legal 9entity or shares common branding with another legal entity. 10For the purposes of this definition, "control" or "controlled" 11means:12        (1) ownership of, or the power to vote, more than 50% 13    of the outstanding shares of any class of voting security 14    of a company;15        (2) control in any manner over the election of a 16    majority of the directors or of individuals exercising 17    similar functions; or18        (3) the power to exercise controlling influence over 19    the management of a company. 20    "Authenticate" means verifying through reasonable means 21that the consumer entitled to exercise consumer rights granted 22in Section 15 is the same consumer exercising consumer rights 23with respect to the personal data at issue.  SB3220- 2 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    "Biometric data" means data generated by automatic 2measurements of an individual's biological characteristics, 3such as a fingerprint, voiceprint, eye retinas, irises, or 4other unique biological patterns or characteristics that are 5used to identify a specific individual. "Biometric data" does 6not include a physical or digital photograph, a video or audio 7recording, or data generated therefrom, unless that data is 8generated to identify a specific individual or information 9collected, used, or stored for health care treatment, payment, 10or operations under HIPAA.11    "Business associate" has the same meaning as in 45 CFR 12Sec. 160.103 under HIPAA.13    "Child" has the same meaning as in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 6501.14    "Consent" means a clear affirmative act signifying a 15consumer's freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous 16agreement to process personal data relating to the consumer. 17"Consent" includes a written statement, written by electronic 18means, or any other unambiguous affirmative action.19    "Consumer" means a natural person who is a resident of the 20State acting only in an individual context. "Consumer" does 21not include a natural person acting in a commercial or 22employment context. 23    "Controller" means the natural or legal person that, 24individually or jointly with others, determines the purpose 25and means of processing personal data.26    "Covered entity" has the same meaning as in 45 CFR Sec.   SB3220- 3 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1160.103 under HIPAA.2    "Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant 3effects concerning a consumer" means a decision made by a 4controller that results in the provision or denial by the 5controller of financial and lending services, housing, 6insurance, education enrollment, criminal justice, employment 7opportunities, health care services, or access to basic 8necessities like food and water.9    "Deidentified data" means data that cannot reasonably be 10linked to an identified or identifiable natural person or a 11device linked to a person. 12    "Fund" means the Consumer Privacy Fund established in 13Section 50.14    "Health record" means a record, other than for financial 15or billing purposes, relating to an individual, kept by a 16health care provider as a result of the professional 17relationship established between the health care provider and 18the individual.19    "Health care provider" means:20        (1) any health care facility as defined in Section 21    8-2001 of the Code of Civil Procedure;22        (2) health care practitioner as defined in Section 23    8-2001 of the Code of Civil Procedure;24        (3) the current and former employers, officers, 25    directors, administrators, agents, or employees of those 26    entities listed in paragraphs (1) and (2); or  SB3220- 4 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1        (4) any person acting within the course and scope of 2    the office, employment, or agency relating to a health 3    care facility or a health care practitioner.4    "HIPAA" means the federal Health Insurance Portability and 5Accountability Act of 1996.6    "Identified or identifiable natural person" means a person 7who can be readily identified directly or indirectly.8    "Institution of higher education" means an educational 9institution that:10        (1) admits as regular students only individuals having 11    a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the 12    recognized equivalent of such a certificate;13        (2) is legally authorized in this State to provide a 14    program of education beyond high school;15        (3) provides an educational program for which it 16    awards a bachelor's or higher degree, or provides a 17    program that is acceptable for full credit toward such a 18    degree, a program of postgraduate or postdoctoral studies, 19    or a program of training to prepare students for gainful 20    employment in a recognized occupation; and21        (4) is a public or other nonprofit institution.22    "Nonprofit organization" means any incorporated or 23unincorporated entity that:24        (1) is operating for religious, charitable, or 25    educational purposes; and26        (2) does not provide net earnings to, or operate in   SB3220- 5 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    any manner that inures to the benefit of, any officer, 2    employee, or shareholder of the entity. 3    "Personal data" means any information that is linked or 4reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable natural 5person. "Personal data" does not include deidentified data or 6publicly available information. 7    "Precise geolocation data" means information derived from 8technology, including, but not limited to, global positioning 9system level latitude and longitude coordinates or other 10mechanisms, that directly identifies the specific location of 11a natural person with precision and accuracy within a radius 12of 1,750 feet. "Precise geolocation data" does not include the 13content of communications, or any data generated by or 14connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems 15or equipment for use by a utility. 16    "Process" or "processing" means any operation or set of 17operations performed, whether by manual or automated means, on 18personal data or on sets of personal data, including, but not 19limited to, the collection, use, storage, disclosure, 20analysis, deletion, or modification of personal data. 21    "Processor" means a natural or legal entity that processes 22personal data on behalf of a controller. 23    "Profiling" means any form of automated processing 24performed on personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict 25personal aspects related to an identified or identifiable 26natural person's economic situation, health, personal   SB3220- 6 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or 2movements. 3    "Protected health information" has the same meaning as in 445 CFR Sec. 160.103 under HIPAA. 5    "Pseudonymous data" means personal data that cannot be 6attributed to a specific natural person without the use of 7additional information, as long as the additional information 8is kept separately and is subject to appropriate technical and 9organizational measures to ensure that the personal data is 10not attributed to an identified or identifiable natural 11person. 12    "Publicly available information" means information that is 13lawfully made available through federal, State, or local 14government records, or information that a business has a 15reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the 16general public through widely distributed media, by the 17consumer, or by a person to whom the consumer has disclosed the 18information, unless the consumer has restricted the 19information to a specific audience. 20    "Sale of personal data" means the exchange of personal 21data for monetary consideration by the controller to a third 22party. "Sale of personal data" does not include:23        (1) the disclosure of personal data to a processor 24    that processes the personal data on behalf of the 25    controller;26        (2) the disclosure of personal data to a third party   SB3220- 7 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    for purposes of providing a product or service requested 2    by the consumer;3        (3) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an 4    affiliate of the controller;5        (4) the disclosure of information that the consumer 6    intentionally made available to the general public via a 7    channel of mass media and did not restrict to a specific 8    audience; or9        (5) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to a 10    third party as an asset that is part of a proposed or 11    actual merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other 12    transaction in which the third party assumes control of 13    all or part of the controller's assets. 14    "Sensitive data" means a category of personal data that 15includes:16        (1) personal data indicating racial or ethnic origin, 17    religious beliefs, mental or physical health diagnosis, 18    sexual orientation, or citizenship or immigration status;19        (2) the processing of genetic or biometric data that 20    is processed for the purpose of uniquely identifying a 21    specific natural person;22        (3) the personal data collected from a known child; or23        (4) precise geolocation data. 24    "State agency" means:25        (1) all departments, offices, commissions, boards, 26    institutions, and political and corporate bodies of the   SB3220- 8 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    State;2        (2) the Supreme Court, appellate courts, and circuit 3    courts; and4        (3) the General Assembly, its committees, or 5    commissions. 6    "Targeted advertising" means displaying advertisements to 7a consumer in which the advertisement is selected based on 8personal data obtained or inferred from that consumer's 9activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites or 10online applications to predict that consumer's preferences or 11interests. "Targeted advertising" does not include:12        (1) advertisements based on activities within a 13    controller's own or affiliated websites or online 14    applications;15        (2) advertisements based on the context of a 16    consumer's current search query, visit to a website, or 17    online application;18        (3) advertisements directed to a consumer in response 19    to the consumer's request for information or feedback; or20        (4) processing personal data solely for measuring or 21    reporting advertising performance, reach, or frequency. 22    "Third party" means a natural or legal person, public 23authority, agency, or body other than the consumer, 24controller, processor, or an affiliate of the processor or the 25controller.26    "Trade secret" has the same meaning as in the Illinois   SB3220- 9 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1Trade Secrets Act. 2    Section 10. Coverage of Act. 3    (a) This Act applies to persons that conduct business in 4the State or produce products or services that are targeted to 5State residents and that during a calendar year control or 6process personal data of at least: 7        (1) 100,000 consumers; or 8        (2) 25,000 consumers and derive over 50% of gross 9    revenue from the sale of personal data. 10    (b) This Act does not apply to any: 11        (1) unit of local government, State, or any political 12    subdivision of the State; 13        (2) financial institution, its affiliate, or data 14    subject to Title V of the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act; 15        (3) covered entity or business associate governed by 16    the privacy, security, and breach notification rules 17    issued by the United States Department of Health and Human 18    Services, 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164 established under 19    HIPAA; 20        (4) nonprofit organization; 21        (5) institution of higher education; 22        (6) law enforcement agency in connection with 23    suspected insurance-related criminal or fraudulent acts or 24    first responders in connection with catastrophic events; 25    or   SB3220- 10 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1        (7) public utility as defined in the Public Utilities 2    Act;3    (c) The following information and data are exempt from 4this Act: 5        (1) protected health information under HIPAA; 6        (2) health records; 7        (3) patient identifying information for purposes of 42 8    CFR Sec. 2.11; 9        (4) identifiable private information for purposes of 10    the federal policy for the protection of human subjects 11    under 45 CFR Part 46; identifiable private information 12    that is otherwise information collected as part of human 13    subjects research under the good clinical practice 14    guidelines issued by the International Council for 15    Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for 16    Pharmaceuticals for Human Use; the protection of human 17    subjects under 21 CFR Parts 50 and 56, or personal data 18    used or shared in research conducted in accordance with 19    the requirements set forth in this Act, or other research 20    conducted in accordance with applicable law; 21        (5) information and documents created for purposes of 22    the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986;23        (6) patient safety work product for purposes of the 24    federal Patient Safety and Quality Improvement Act; 25        (7) information derived from any of the health 26    care-related information listed in this subsection that is   SB3220- 11 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    deidentified in accordance with the requirements for 2    deidentification under HIPAA; 3        (8) information originating from, and intermingled to 4    be indistinguishable from, or information treated in the 5    same manner as information exempt under this subsection 6    that is maintained by a covered entity or business 7    associate, or a program or qualified service organization 8    as defined by 42 3 CFR Sec. 2.11; 9        (9) information used only for public health activities 10    and purposes as authorized by HIPAA; 11        (10) the collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, 12    communication, or use of any personal information bearing 13    on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, credit 14    capacity, character, general reputation, personal 15    characteristics, or mode of living by a consumer reporting 16    agency, furnisher, or user that provides information for 17    use in a consumer report, and by a user of a consumer 18    report, but only to the extent that the activity is 19    regulated by and authorized under the federal Fair Credit 20    Reporting Act; 21        (11) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 22    disclosed in compliance with the federal Driver's Privacy 23    Protection Act of 1994; 24        (12) personal data regulated by the federal Family 25    Educational Rights and Privacy Act; 26        (13) personal data collected, processed, sold, or   SB3220- 12 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    disclosed in compliance with the federal Farm Credit Act; 2        (14) data processed or maintained: 3            (A) in the course of an individual applying to, 4        employed by, or acting as an agent or independent 5        contractor of a controller, processor, or third party, 6        to the extent that the data is collected and used 7        within the context of that role; 8            (B) as the emergency contact information of an 9        individual used for emergency contact purposes; or 10            (C) that is necessary to administer benefits for 11        another individual and used for the purposes of 12        administering those benefits; 13        (15) data processed by a public utility, an affiliate 14    of a public utility, or a holding company system organized 15    specifically for the purpose of providing goods or 16    services to a public utility. For purposes of this 17    paragraph, "holding company system" means 2 or more 18    affiliated persons, one or more of which is a public 19    utility; and 20        (16) personal data collected and used for purposes of 21    federal policy under the Combat Methamphetamine Epidemic 22    Act of 2005. 23    (d) Controllers and processors that comply with the 24verifiable parental consent requirements of the Children's 25Online Privacy Protection Act are deemed compliant with any 26obligation to obtain parental consent under this Act.   SB3220- 13 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    Section 15. Consumer rights and remedies. 2    (a) A consumer may invoke the consumer rights authorized 3under this Section at any time by submitting a request to a 4controller, via the means specified by the controller under 5Section 20, specifying the consumer rights the consumer wishes 6to invoke. A child's parent or legal guardian may invoke these 7consumer rights on behalf of the child regarding processing 8personal data belonging to the child. 9    (b) A controller shall comply with an authenticated 10consumer request to exercise the right to: 11        (1) confirm whether a controller is processing the 12    consumer's personal data and to access the personal data, 13    unless the confirmation and access would require the 14    controller to reveal a trade secret; 15        (2) correct inaccuracies in the consumer's personal 16    data, taking into account the nature of the personal data 17    and the purposes of processing the data; 18        (3) delete personal data provided by or obtained about 19    the consumer; 20        (4) obtain a copy of the consumer's personal data that 21    the consumer previously provided to the controller in a 22    portable and, to the extent technically practicable, 23    readily usable format that allows the consumer to transmit 24    the data to another controller without hindrance, if the 25    processing is carried out by automated means. The   SB3220- 14 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    controller may not be required to reveal any trade 2    secrets; and 3        (5) opt out of the processing of personal data for 4    purposes of targeted advertising, the sale of personal 5    data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that 6    produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning 7    the consumer. 8    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, a controller 9shall comply with a request by a consumer to exercise the 10consumer rights under this Section as follows: 11        (1) a controller shall respond to the consumer without 12    undue delay, but in all cases within 45 days of receipt of 13    the request submitted under the methods described in this 14    Section. The response period may be extended once by 45 15    additional days if reasonably necessary, taking into 16    consideration the complexity and number of the consumer's 17    requests, as long as the controller informs the consumer 18    of any extension within the initial 45-day response 19    period, together with the reason for the extension; 20        (2) if a controller declines to take action regarding 21    the consumer's request, the controller shall inform the 22    consumer without undue delay, but no later than 45 days 23    after receipt of the request of the justification for 24    declining to take action and instructions on how to appeal 25    that decision; 26        (3) information provided in response to a consumer   SB3220- 15 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    request shall be provided by a controller free of charge, 2    up to twice annually per consumer. If requests from a 3    consumer are excessive, repetitive, technically 4    infeasible, or manifestly unfounded, the controller may 5    charge the consumer a reasonable fee to cover the 6    administrative costs of complying with the request or 7    decline to act on the request. The controller bears the 8    burden of demonstrating the excessive, repetitive, 9    technically infeasible, or manifestly unfounded nature of 10    the request; 11        (4) if a controller is unable to authenticate the 12    request using commercially reasonable efforts, the 13    controller is not required to comply with a request to 14    initiate an action under this Section and may request that 15    the consumer provide additional information reasonably 16    necessary to authenticate the consumer and the consumer's 17    request; and 18        (5) a controller that has obtained personal data about 19    a consumer from a source other than the consumer is deemed 20    in compliance with a consumer's request to delete such 21    data under this Section by: 22            (A) retaining a record of the deletion request and 23        the minimum data necessary for the purpose of ensuring 24        the consumer's personal data remains deleted from the 25        business' records and not using the retained data for 26        any other purpose under the provisions of this Act; or   SB3220- 16 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1            (B) opting the consumer out of the processing of 2        the personal data for any other purpose unless 3        authorized elsewhere in this Act. 4    (d) A controller shall establish a process for a consumer 5to appeal the controller's refusal to take action on a request 6within a reasonable period of time after the consumer's 7receipt of the decision under of this Section. The appeal 8process shall be conspicuously available and similar to the 9process for submitting requests to initiate action under this 10Section. Within 60 days of receipt of an appeal, a controller 11shall inform the consumer in writing of any action taken or not 12taken in response to the appeal, including a written 13explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If the appeal is 14denied, the controller shall also provide the consumer with an 15online mechanism, if available, or other method through which 16the consumer may contact the Attorney General to submit a 17complaint. 18    Section 20. Controller's duties and responsibilities. 19    (a) A controller shall: 20        (1) limit the collection of personal data to what is 21    adequate, relevant, and reasonably necessary in relation 22    to the purposes for which the data is processed as 23    disclosed to the consumer; 24        (2) except as otherwise provided in this Section, not 25    process personal data for purposes that are neither   SB3220- 17 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    reasonably necessary to nor compatible with the disclosed 2    purposes for which the personal data is processed as 3    disclosed to the consumer, unless the controller obtains 4    the consumer's consent; 5        (3) establish, implement, and maintain reasonable 6    administrative, technical, and physical data security 7    practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and 8    accessibility of personal data. The data security 9    practices shall be appropriate to the volume and nature of 10    the personal data at issue; 11        (4) not process personal data in violation of State 12    and federal laws that prohibit unlawful discrimination 13    against consumers. A controller shall not discriminate 14    against a consumer for exercising any of the consumer 15    rights contained this Act, including denying goods or 16    services, charging different prices or rates for goods or 17    services, or providing a different level of quality of 18    goods and services to the consumer. Nothing in this 19    paragraph may be construed to require a controller to 20    provide a product or service that requires the personal 21    data of a consumer that the controller does not collect or 22    maintain or to prohibit a controller from offering a 23    different price, rate, level, quality, or selection of 24    goods or services to a consumer, including offering goods 25    or services for no fee, if the offer is related to a 26    consumer's voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty,   SB3220- 18 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    rewards, premium features, discounts, or club card 2    program; and 3        (5) not process sensitive data concerning a consumer 4    without obtaining the consumer's consent, or, in the case 5    of the processing of sensitive data collected from a known 6    child, process the data in accordance with the federal 7    Children's Online Privacy Protection Act. 8    (b) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind 9that purports to waive or limit in any way consumer rights 10under this Act is deemed contrary to public policy and is void 11and unenforceable. 12    (c) Controllers shall provide consumers with a reasonably 13accessible, clear, and meaningful privacy notice that 14includes: 15        (1) the categories of personal data processed by the 16    controller; 17        (2) the purpose for processing personal data; 18        (3) how consumers may exercise their consumer rights 19    under this Act, including how a consumer may appeal a 20    controller's decision regarding a consumer's request; 21        (4) the categories of personal data that the 22    controller shares with third parties, if any; and 23        (5) the categories of third parties, if any, with whom 24    the controller shares personal data. 25    (d) If a controller sells personal data to third parties 26or processes personal data for targeted advertising, the   SB3220- 19 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1controller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose such 2activity, as well as the manner in which a consumer may 3exercise the right to opt out of processing. 4    (e) A controller shall establish, and shall describe in a 5privacy notice, one or more secure and reliable means for 6consumers to submit a request to exercise their consumer 7rights under this Act. The different ways to submit a request 8by a consumer must consider the ways in which consumers 9normally interact with the controller, the need for secure and 10reliable communication of the requests, and the ability of the 11controller to authenticate the identity of the consumer making 12the request. Controllers may not require a consumer to create 13a new account to exercise consumer rights under this Act but 14may require a consumer to use an existing account. 15    Section 25. Processor duties and responsibilities. 16    (a) A processor shall adhere to the instructions of a 17controller and shall assist the controller in meeting its 18obligations under this Act. This assistance shall include: 19        (1) supporting the controller's obligation to respond 20    to consumer rights requests under this Act by taking into 21    account the nature of processing and the information 22    available to the processor using appropriate technical and 23    organizational measures as reasonably practicable; 24        (2) assisting the controller in meeting the 25    controller's obligations for the security of processing   SB3220- 20 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    the personal data and for the notification of a breach of 2    the security of the system of the processor under 3    applicable State law by taking into account the nature of 4    processing and the information available to the processor; 5    and 6        (3) providing necessary information to enable the 7    controller to conduct and document data protection 8    assessments under this Act. 9    (b) A contract between a controller and a processor 10governs the processor's data processing procedures for 11processing performed on behalf of the controller. The contract 12shall be binding and shall clearly set forth instructions for 13processing personal data, the nature and purpose of 14processing, the type of data subject to processing, the 15duration of processing, and the rights and obligations of both 16parties. The contract shall also include requirements that the 17processor shall: 18        (1) ensure that each person processing personal data 19    is subject to a duty of confidentiality with respect to 20    the data; 21        (2) at the controller's direction, delete or return 22    all personal data to the controller as requested at the 23    end of the provision of services, unless retention of the 24    personal data is required by law; 25        (3) upon the reasonable request of the controller, 26    make available to the controller all information in its   SB3220- 21 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    possession necessary to demonstrate the processor's 2    compliance with the obligations in this Act; 3        (4) allow and cooperate with reasonable assessments by 4    the controller or the controller's designated assessor. 5    Alternatively, the processor may arrange for a qualified 6    and independent assessor to conduct an assessment of the 7    processor's policies and technical and organizational 8    measures in support of the obligations in this Act using 9    an appropriate and accepted control standard or framework 10    and assessment procedure for assessments. The processor 11    shall provide a report of the assessment to the controller 12    upon request; and 13        (5) engage any subcontractor under a written contract 14    under this Section that requires the subcontractor to meet 15    the obligations of the processor for personal data. 16    (c) Nothing in this Section may be construed to relieve a 17controller or processor from the liabilities imposed on it by 18virtue of its role in a processing relationship as required 19under this Act. 20    (d) Determining whether a person is acting as a controller 21or processor for a specific processing of data is a fact-based 22determination that depends upon the context in which personal 23data is to be processed. A processor that continues to adhere 24to a controller's instructions for a specific processing of 25personal data remains a processor.   SB3220- 22 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    Section 30. Required data protection impact assessment. 2    (a) Controllers shall conduct and document a data 3protection impact assessment of each of the following 4processing activities involving personal data: 5        (1) the processing of personal data for the purposes 6    of targeted advertising; 7        (2) the processing of personal data for the purposes 8    of selling of personal data; 9        (3) the processing of personal data for the purposes 10    of profiling, if the profiling presents a reasonably 11    foreseeable risk of: 12            (A) unfair or deceptive treatment of consumers or 13        disparate impact on consumers; 14            (B) financial, physical, or reputational injury to 15        consumers; 16            (C) a physical or other intrusion upon consumers' 17        solitude or seclusion or their private affairs or 18        concerns if an intrusion would be offensive to a 19        reasonable person; or 20            (D) other substantial injury to consumers; 21        (4) the processing of sensitive data; and 22        (5) any processing of personal data that presents a 23    heightened risk of harm to consumers. 24    (b) Data protection impact assessments conducted under 25this Section shall identify and weigh the benefits that may 26flow, directly and indirectly, from the processing, to the   SB3220- 23 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1controller, the consumer, other stakeholders, and the public 2against the potential risks to the rights of the consumer 3associated with such processing, as mitigated by safeguards 4that can be employed by the controller to reduce the risk. The 5use of deidentified data and the reasonable expectations of 6consumers, as well as the context of the processing of 7personal data and the relationship between the controller and 8the consumer whose personal data will be processed, shall be 9factored into this assessment by the controller. 10    (c) The Attorney General may request that a controller 11disclose any data protection impact assessment that is 12relevant to an investigation conducted by the Attorney 13General, and the controller shall make the data protection 14impact assessment available to the Attorney General. The 15Attorney General may evaluate the data protection impact 16assessments for compliance with the requirements of this Act. 17    (d) Data protection impact assessments are confidential 18and exempt from disclosure, public inspection, and copying 19under the Freedom of Information Act. 20    (e) The disclosure of a data protection impact assessment 21under a request from the Attorney General under this Section 22does not constitute a waiver of the attorney-client privilege 23or work product protection of the assessment and any 24information contained in the assessment. 25    (f) A single data protection assessment may address a 26comparable set of processing operations that include similar   SB3220- 24 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1activities. 2    (g) Data protection assessments conducted by a controller 3for the purpose of compliance with other laws or regulations 4may comply under this Section if the assessments have a 5reasonably comparable scope and effect. 6    (h) Data protection assessment requirements apply to 7processing activities created or generated on or after June 1, 82028. 9    Section 35. Controller in possession of de-identified 10data. 11    (a) The controller in possession of deidentified data 12shall: 13        (1) take reasonable measures to ensure the data cannot 14    be associated with a natural person; 15        (2) publicly commit to maintaining and using 16    deidentified data without attempting to reidentify the 17    data; and 18        (3) contractually obligate any recipients of the 19    deidentified data to comply with this Act. 20    (b) Nothing in this Act may be construed to require a 21controller or processor to: 22        (1) reidentify deidentified data or pseudonymous data; 23    or 24        (2) maintain data in identifiable form or collect, 25    obtain, retain, or access any data or technology to be   SB3220- 25 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    capable of associating an authenticated consumer request 2    with personal data. 3    (c) Nothing in this Act may be construed to require a 4controller or processor to comply with an authenticated 5consumer rights request under Section 15 if: 6        (1) the controller is not reasonably capable of 7    associating the request with the personal data or it would 8    be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to associate 9    the request with the personal data; 10        (2) the controller does not use the personal data to 11    recognize or respond to the specific consumer who is the 12    subject of the personal data, or associate the personal 13    data with other personal data about the same specific 14    consumer; and 15        (3) the controller does not sell the personal data to 16    any third party or otherwise voluntarily disclose the 17    personal data to any third party other than a processor, 18    except as otherwise permitted in this Section. 19    (d) The consumer rights contained in this Act do not apply 20to pseudonymous data in cases in which the controller is able 21to demonstrate any information necessary to identify the 22consumer is kept separately and is subject to appropriate 23technical and organizational measures to ensure that the 24personal data is not attributed to an identified or 25identifiable natural person. 26    (e) A controller that discloses pseudonymous data or   SB3220- 26 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1de-identified data shall exercise reasonable oversight to 2monitor compliance with any contractual commitments to which 3the pseudonymous data or deidentified data is subject and take 4appropriate steps to address any breaches of those contractual 5commitments. 6    Section 40. Exceptions for controllers and processors. 7    (a) Nothing in this Act may be construed to restrict a 8controller's or processor's ability to: 9        (1) comply with federal, State, or local laws or 10    regulations; 11        (2) comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory 12    inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, 13    State, local, or other governmental authorities; 14        (3) cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning 15    conduct or activity that the controller or processor 16    reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, 17    State, or local laws, rules, or regulations; 18        (4) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or 19    defend legal claims; 20        (5) provide a product or service specifically 21    requested by a consumer or a parent or guardian of a known 22    child; 23        (6) perform a contract to which the consumer or parent 24    or guardian of a known child is a party, including 25    fulfilling the terms of a written warranty;   SB3220- 27 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1        (7) take steps at the request of the consumer or 2    parent or guardian of a known child before entering into a 3    contract; 4        (8) take immediate steps to protect an interest that 5    is essential for the life or physical safety of the 6    consumer or of another natural person; 7        (9) prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to 8    security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, 9    malicious or deceptive activities, or any illegal 10    activity; preserve the integrity or security of systems; 11    or investigate, report, or prosecute those responsible for 12    any such action; 13        (10) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific or 14    statistical research in the public interest that adheres 15    to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws and is 16    approved, monitored, and governed by an institutional 17    review board or similar independent oversight entities 18    that determine: 19            (A) if the deletion of the information is likely 20        to provide substantial benefits that do not 21        exclusively accrue to the controller; 22            (B) the expected benefits of the research outweigh 23        the privacy risks; and 24            (C) if the controller has implemented reasonable 25        safeguards to mitigate privacy risks associated with 26        research, including any risks associated with   SB3220- 28 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1        reidentification; or 2        (11) assist another controller, processor, or third 3    party with any of the obligations under this Section. 4    (b) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 5under this Act do not restrict a controller's or processor's 6ability to collect, use, or retain data to: 7        (1) conduct internal research to develop, improve, or 8    repair products, services, or technology; 9        (2) effectuate a product recall; 10        (3) identify and repair technical errors that impair 11    existing or intended functionality; or 12        (4) perform internal operations that are reasonably 13    aligned with the expectations of the consumer or 14    reasonably anticipated based on the consumer's existing 15    relationship with the controller or are otherwise 16    compatible with processing data in furtherance of the 17    provision of a product or service specifically requested 18    by a consumer or a parent or guardian of a known child or 19    the performance of a contract to which the consumer or a 20    parent or guardian of a known child is a party. 21    (c) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 22under this Act do not apply to a controller or processor if 23compliance would violate an evidentiary privilege under State 24law. Nothing in this Act may be construed to prevent a 25controller or processor from providing personal data 26concerning a consumer to a person covered by an evidentiary   SB3220- 29 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1privilege under State laws as part of a privileged 2communication. 3    (d) A controller or processor that discloses personal data 4to a third-party controller or processor, in compliance with 5the requirements of this Act, is not in violation of this Act 6if the third-party controller or processor that receives and 7processes such personal data is in violation of this Act; 8provided that, at the time of disclosing the personal data, 9the disclosing controller or processor did not have actual 10knowledge that the recipient intended to commit a violation. A 11third-party controller or processor receiving personal data 12from a controller or processor in compliance with the 13requirements of this Act is also not in violation of this Act 14for the transgressions of the controller or processor from 15which it receives such personal data. 16    (e) Nothing in this Act may be construed as an obligation 17imposed on controllers and processors that adversely affects 18the privacy or other rights or freedoms of any persons, 19including, but not limited to, the right of free speech under 20the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or 21applies to the processing of personal data by a person in the 22course of a purely personal or household activity. 23    (f) Personal data processed by a controller under this 24Section may not be processed for any purpose other than those 25expressly listed unless otherwise allowed by this Act. 26Personal data processed by a controller under this Section may   SB3220- 30 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1be processed to the extent that such processing is: 2        (1) reasonably necessary and proportionate to the 3    purposes listed in this Section; and 4        (2) adequate, relevant, and limited to what is 5    necessary for the specific purposes listed in this 6    Section. Personal data collected, used, or retained under 7    this Section shall, if applicable, take into account the 8    nature and purpose or purposes of such collection, use, or 9    retention. The data shall be subject to reasonable 10    administrative, technical, and physical measures to 11    protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility 12    of personal data and to reduce reasonably foreseeable 13    risks of harm to consumers relating to the collection, 14    use, or retention of personal data. 15    (g) If a controller processes personal data under an 16exemption in this Section, the controller bears the burden of 17demonstrating that the processing qualifies for the exemption 18and complies with the requirements in this Section. 19    (h) Processing personal data for the purposes expressly 20identified in this Section does not by itself make an entity a 21controller with respect to such processing. 22    Section 45. Enforcement by the Attorney General. 23    (a) The Attorney General has exclusive authority to 24enforce violations of this Act. The Attorney General may 25enforce this Act by bringing an action in the name of the State   SB3220- 31 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1of Illinois on behalf of persons residing in this State. The 2Attorney General has all powers and duties granted to the 3Attorney General under State law to investigate and prosecute 4any violation of this Act. The Attorney General may demand any 5information, documents, or physical evidence from any 6controller or processor believed to be engaged in, or about to 7engage in, any violation of this Act. 8    (b) Before initiating any action for a violation of this 9Act, the Attorney General shall provide a controller or 10processor 30 days' written notice identifying the specific 11provisions of this Act that the Attorney General alleges have 12been or are being violated. If within the 30 days the 13controller or processor cures the noticed violation and 14provides the Attorney General an express written statement 15that the alleged violations have been cured and that no 16further violations will occur, no action for damages under 17this Section may be initiated against the controller or 18processor. 19    (c) If a controller or processor continues to violate this 20Act following the cure period under this Section or breaches 21an express written statement provided to the Attorney General 22under this Section, the Attorney General may initiate an 23action and seek damages for up to $7,500 for each continued 24violation under this Act. 25    (d) Nothing in this Act or any other law, regulation, or 26the equivalent may be construed as providing the basis for, or   SB3220- 32 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1give rise to, a private right of action for violations of this 2Act. 3    (e) The Attorney General may recover reasonable expenses 4incurred in investigating and preparing the case, court costs, 5attorney's fees, and any other relief ordered by the court of 6any action initiated under this Act. 7    Section 50. Consumer Privacy Fund. The Consumer Privacy 8Fund is created as a special fund in the State treasury. The 9Fund shall be administered by the Office of the Attorney 10General. All civil penalties collected under this Act shall be 11deposited into the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund 12accrue to the Fund. Moneys in the fund shall be used by the 13Office of the Attorney General to enforce this Act. 14    Section 900. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 15changing Section 7 as follows: 16    (5 ILCS 140/7)17    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-300)18    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 19    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 20record that contains information that is exempt from 21disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 22that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 23to redact the information that is exempt. The public body   SB3220- 33 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1shall make the remaining information available for inspection 2and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 3be exempt from inspection and copying: 4        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 5    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 6    regulations implementing federal or State law. 7        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 8    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 9    or a court order. 10        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 11    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 12    specifically designed to provide information to one or 13    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 14    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 15        (c) Personal information contained within public 16    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 17    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 18    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 19    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 20    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 21    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 22    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 23    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 24    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 25    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 26    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal   SB3220- 34 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    privacy. 2        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 3    created in the course of administrative enforcement 4    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 5    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 6    extent that disclosure would: 7            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 8        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 9        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 10        agency that is the recipient of the request; 11            (ii) interfere with active administrative 12        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 13        that is the recipient of the request; 14            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 15        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 16        hearing; 17            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 18        confidential source, confidential information 19        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 20        who file complaints with or provide information to 21        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 22        penal agencies; except that the identities of 23        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 24        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 25        local government, except when disclosure would 26        interfere with an active criminal investigation   SB3220- 35 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 2        request; 3            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 4        techniques other than those generally used and known 5        or disclose internal documents of correctional 6        agencies related to detection, observation, or 7        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 8        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 9        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 10        request; 11            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 12        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 13            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 14        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 15        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 16    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 17    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 18    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 19    request did not create the record, did not participate in 20    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 21    of the record, and only has access to the record through 22    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 23    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 24    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 25    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.26        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional   SB3220- 36 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 2    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 3    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 4    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 5    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 6    Board. 7        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 8    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 9    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 10        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 11    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 12        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 13    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 14    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 15    materials are available in the library of the correctional 16    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 17    confined. 18        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 19    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 20    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 21    materials include records from staff members' personnel 22    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 23    information. 24        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 25    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 26    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available   SB3220- 37 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    through an administrative request to the Department of 2    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 3    Mental Health. 4        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 5    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 6    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 7    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 8    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 9    institution or facility.10        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 11    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 12    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 13    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 14    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 15    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 16    or school address, work telephone number, social security 17    number, or any other identifying information, except as 18    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 19    or claim. 20        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 21    requested by a person committed to the Department of 22    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 23    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 24    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 25    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 26    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or   SB3220- 38 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    claim. 2        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 3    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 4    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 5    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 6    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 7    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 8    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 9    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 10    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 11        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 12    information obtained from a person or business where the 13    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 14    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 15    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 16    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 17    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 18    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 19    requested.20        The information included under this exemption includes 21    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 22    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 23    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 24    company within the investment portfolio of a private 25    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 26    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity   SB3220- 39 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 2    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 3    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 4    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 5    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 6    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 7    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 8    privately held company may cause competitive harm.9        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 10    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 11    to disclosure. 12        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 13    agreement, including information which if it were 14    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 15    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 16    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 17    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 18    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 19    award or final selection is made. 20        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 21    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 22    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 23    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 24    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 25    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 26    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the   SB3220- 40 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 2    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 3    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 4    legal rights of the general public. 5        (j) The following information pertaining to 6    educational matters:7            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 8        examination data used to administer an academic 9        examination; 10            (ii) information received by a primary or 11        secondary school, college, or university under its 12        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 13        their academic peers; 14            (iii) information concerning a school or 15        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 16        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 17        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and18            (iv) course materials or research materials used 19        by faculty members. 20        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 21    submissions, and other construction related technical 22    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 23    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 24    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 25    including, but not limited to, power generating and 26    distribution stations and other transmission and   SB3220- 41 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 2    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 3    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 4    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 5    security. 6        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 7    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 8    public body makes the minutes available to the public 9    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 10        (m) Communications between a public body and an 11    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 12    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 13    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 14    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 15    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 16    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 17    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 18        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 19    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 20    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 21    cases in which discipline is imposed. 22        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 23    with automated data processing operations, including, but 24    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 25    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 26    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation   SB3220- 42 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 2    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 3    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 4    security of the system or its data or the security of 5    materials exempt under this Section. 6        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 7    between public bodies and their employees or 8    representatives, except that any final contract or 9    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 10        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 11    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 12    an applicant for a license or employment. 13        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 14    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 15    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 16    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 17    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 18    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 19    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 20    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 21    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 22    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 23    until a sale is consummated. 24        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 25    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 26    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly   SB3220- 43 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 2    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 3    intergovernmental risk management association or 4    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 5    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 6        (t) Information contained in or related to 7    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 8    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 9    for the regulation or supervision of financial 10    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 11    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 12    law. 13        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 14    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 15    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 16    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 17    Electronic Transactions Act. 18        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 19    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 20    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 21    community's population or systems, facilities, or 22    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 23    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 24    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 25    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 26    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may   SB3220- 44 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    include such things as details pertaining to the 2    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 3    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 4    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 5        (w) (Blank). 6        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 7    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 8    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 9    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 10    Illinois Power Agency. 11        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 12    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 13    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 14    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 15    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 16    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 17    Commission. 18        (z) Information about students exempted from 19    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 20    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 21    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 22    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 23    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 24        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 25    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 26        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality   SB3220- 45 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 2    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 3    Mortality Review Team Act. 4        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 5    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 6    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 7    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.8        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 9    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 10    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 11    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 12        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 13    information of persons who are minors and are also 14    participants and registrants in programs of park 15    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 16    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 17    associations.18        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 19    information of participants and registrants in programs of 20    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 21    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 22    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 23    minors.24        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 25    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 26    2012.   SB3220- 46 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 2    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 3    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 4    School Code and any information contained in that report. 5        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 6    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 7    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 8    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 9    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 10    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 11    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 12    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 13    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 14    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 15    Corrections.16        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 17    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 18        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 19    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 20    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 21    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 22    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 23    of a governmental entity or a person. 24        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 25    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 26    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the   SB3220- 47 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 2    the procedure.3        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 4    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 5    Confidential Reporting Act. 6        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 7    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 8    Act. 9        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 10    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 11        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 12    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 13    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 14    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 15    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 16    Act.17        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 18    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 19        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 20    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 21        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 22    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 23    protected health information, including demographic 24    information, that may be contained within or extracted 25    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 26    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations,   SB3220- 48 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 2    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 3    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 4    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 5    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 6    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 7    160.103. 8        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 9    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 10    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 11    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 12        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 13    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 14    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 15    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 16    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 17    include information classified as safeguards, 18    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 19    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 20    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 21    security advisories, and other applicable communications 22    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 23    security sensitive information. 24        (vv) Disclosure data protection impact assessments 25    done under the Illinois Consumer Data Privacy Act. 26    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the   SB3220- 49 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 2prior to disclosure under this Act. 3    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 4Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 5public records prior to disclosure under this Act.6    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 7paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 8redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 9Act.10    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 11public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 12agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 13behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 14governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 15Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 16for purposes of this Act. 17    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 18information or limit the availability of records to the 19public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 20in this Act. 21(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 22103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff. 231-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 24eff. 1-1-25; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 104-443, eff. 1-1-26; 25revised 1-7-26.)   SB3220- 50 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-300)2    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 3    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 4record that contains information that is exempt from 5disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 6that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 7to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 8shall make the remaining information available for inspection 9and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 10be exempt from inspection and copying: 11        (a) Records created or compiled by a State public 12    defender agency or commission subject to the State Public 13    Defender Act that contain: individual client identity; 14    individual case file information; individual investigation 15    records and other records that are otherwise subject to 16    attorney-client privilege; records that would not be 17    discoverable in litigation; records under Section 2.15; 18    training materials; records related to attorney 19    consultation and representation strategy; or any of the 20    above concerning clients of county public defenders or 21    other defender agencies and firms. This exclusion does not 22    apply to deidentified, aggregated, administrative records, 23    such as general case processing and workload information. 24        (a-5) Information specifically prohibited from 25    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 26    regulations implementing federal or State law.   SB3220- 51 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 2    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 3    or a court order. 4        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 5    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 6    specifically designed to provide information to one or 7    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 8    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 9        (c) Personal information contained within public 10    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 11    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 12    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 13    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 14    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 15    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 16    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 17    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 18    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 19    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 20    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 21    privacy. 22        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 23    created in the course of administrative enforcement 24    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 25    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 26    extent that disclosure would:   SB3220- 52 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 2        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 3        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 4        agency that is the recipient of the request; 5            (ii) interfere with active administrative 6        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 7        that is the recipient of the request; 8            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 9        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 10        hearing; 11            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 12        confidential source, confidential information 13        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 14        who file complaints with or provide information to 15        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 16        penal agencies; except that the identities of 17        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 18        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 19        local government, except when disclosure would 20        interfere with an active criminal investigation 21        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 22        request; 23            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 24        techniques other than those generally used and known 25        or disclose internal documents of correctional 26        agencies related to detection, observation, or   SB3220- 53 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 2        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 3        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 4        request; 5            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 6        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 7            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 8        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 9        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 10    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 11    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 12    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 13    request did not create the record, did not participate in 14    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 15    of the record, and only has access to the record through 16    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 17    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 18    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 19    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.20        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 21    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 22    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 23    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 24    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 25    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 26    Board.   SB3220- 54 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 2    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 3    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 4        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 5    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 6        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 7    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 8    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 9    materials are available in the library of the correctional 10    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 11    confined. 12        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 13    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 14    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 15    materials include records from staff members' personnel 16    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 17    information. 18        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 19    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 20    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 21    through an administrative request to the Department of 22    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 23    Mental Health. 24        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 25    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 26    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the   SB3220- 55 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 2    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 3    institution or facility.4        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 5    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 6    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 7    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 8    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 9    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 10    or school address, work telephone number, social security 11    number, or any other identifying information, except as 12    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 13    or claim. 14        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 15    requested by a person committed to the Department of 16    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 17    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 18    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 19    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 20    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 21    claim. 22        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 23    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 24    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 25    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 26    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and   SB3220- 56 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 2    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 3    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 4    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 5        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 6    information obtained from a person or business where the 7    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 8    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 9    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 10    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 11    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 12    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 13    requested.14        The information included under this exemption includes 15    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 16    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 17    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 18    company within the investment portfolio of a private 19    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 20    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 21    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 22    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 23    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 24    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 25    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 26    held company within the investment portfolio of a private   SB3220- 57 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 2    privately held company may cause competitive harm.3        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 4    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 5    to disclosure. 6        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 7    agreement, including information which if it were 8    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 9    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 10    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 11    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 12    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 13    award or final selection is made. 14        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 15    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 16    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 17    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 18    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 19    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 20    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 21    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 22    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 23    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 24    legal rights of the general public. 25        (j) The following information pertaining to 26    educational matters:  SB3220- 58 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 2        examination data used to administer an academic 3        examination; 4            (ii) information received by a primary or 5        secondary school, college, or university under its 6        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 7        their academic peers; 8            (iii) information concerning a school or 9        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 10        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 11        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and12            (iv) course materials or research materials used 13        by faculty members. 14        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 15    submissions, and other construction related technical 16    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 17    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 18    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 19    including, but not limited to, power generating and 20    distribution stations and other transmission and 21    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 22    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 23    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 24    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 25    security. 26        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the   SB3220- 59 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 2    public body makes the minutes available to the public 3    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 4        (m) Communications between a public body and an 5    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 6    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 7    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 8    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 9    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 10    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 11    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 12        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 13    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 14    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 15    cases in which discipline is imposed. 16        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 17    with automated data processing operations, including, but 18    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 19    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 20    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 21    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 22    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 23    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 24    security of the system or its data or the security of 25    materials exempt under this Section. 26        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters   SB3220- 60 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    between public bodies and their employees or 2    representatives, except that any final contract or 3    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 4        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 5    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 6    an applicant for a license or employment. 7        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 8    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 9    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 10    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 11    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 12    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 13    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 14    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 15    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 16    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 17    until a sale is consummated. 18        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 19    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 20    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 21    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 22    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 23    intergovernmental risk management association or 24    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 25    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 26        (t) Information contained in or related to   SB3220- 61 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 2    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 3    for the regulation or supervision of financial 4    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 5    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 6    law. 7        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 8    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 9    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 10    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 11    Electronic Transactions Act. 12        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 13    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 14    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 15    community's population or systems, facilities, or 16    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 17    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 18    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 19    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 20    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 21    include such things as details pertaining to the 22    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 23    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 24    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 25        (w) (Blank). 26        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or   SB3220- 62 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 2    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 3    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 4    Illinois Power Agency. 5        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 6    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 7    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 8    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 9    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 10    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 11    Commission. 12        (z) Information about students exempted from 13    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 14    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 15    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 16    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 17    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 18        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 19    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 20        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 21    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 22    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 23    Mortality Review Team Act. 24        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 25    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 26    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or   SB3220- 63 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.2        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 3    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 4    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 5    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 6        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 7    information of persons who are minors and are also 8    participants and registrants in programs of park 9    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 10    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 11    associations.12        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 13    information of participants and registrants in programs of 14    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 15    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 16    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 17    minors.18        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 19    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 20    2012. 21        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 22    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 23    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 24    School Code and any information contained in that report. 25        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 26    detained by the Department of Human Services under the   SB3220- 64 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 2    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 3    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 4    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 5    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 6    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 7    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 8    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 9    Corrections.10        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 11    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 12        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 13    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 14    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 15    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 16    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 17    of a governmental entity or a person. 18        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 19    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 20    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 21    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 22    the procedure.23        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 24    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 25    Confidential Reporting Act. 26        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the   SB3220- 65 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 2    Act. 3        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 4    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 5        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 6    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 7    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 8    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 9    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 10    Act.11        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 12    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 13        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 14    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 15        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 16    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 17    protected health information, including demographic 18    information, that may be contained within or extracted 19    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 20    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 21    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 22    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 23    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 24    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 25    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 26    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR   SB3220- 66 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    160.103. 2        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 3    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 4    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 5    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 6        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 7    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 8    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 9    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 10    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 11    include information classified as safeguards, 12    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 13    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 14    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 15    security advisories, and other applicable communications 16    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 17    security sensitive information. 18        (vv) Disclosure data protection impact assessments 19    done under the Illinois Consumer Data Privacy Act. 20    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 21Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 22prior to disclosure under this Act. 23    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 24Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 25public records prior to disclosure under this Act.26    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under   SB3220- 67 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 2redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 3Act.4    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 5public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 6agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 7behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 8governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 9Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 10for purposes of this Act. 11    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 12information or limit the availability of records to the 13public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 14in this Act. 15(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 16103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff. 171-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 18eff. 1-1-25; 104-300, eff. 1-1-27; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 19104-443, eff. 1-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 20    Section 905. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 21Section 5.1038 as follows: 22    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)23    Sec. 5.1038. The Consumer Privacy Fund.    SB3220- 68 -LRB104 18755 SPS 32198 b1    Section 950. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act 2makes changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by 3text that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a 4Section represented by multiple versions), the use of that 5text does not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the 6changes made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any 7other Public Act.